Rhode Island, session 2025, SB679.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 31-3 of the General Laws entitled "Registration of Vehicles" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
31-3-31.4. Registration of forestry vehicles -- Use of farm plates.
(a) Forestry vehicles, equipped with rubber tires while being used in forestry and operated
on highways, shall be registered on a form furnished by the administrator of the division of motor
vehicles and shall be assigned a special number farm plate pursuant to the provisions of § 31-3-31
with a suitable symbol or letter indicating the usage of the forestry vehicle.
(b) As used in this section:
(1) "Forest land" shall have the same meaning as defined in § 2-27-2.
(2) "Forest product operations" means any and all trade occupations involving the
harvesting, production, maintaining, and sale of forest products originating in the state including,
but not limited to:
(i) Arboriculture and logging; and
(ii) Kiln drying, operations of firewood, saw milling, lumber, pallets, biochar, mulch,
compost, biomass, wood chips, saw dust, timbers, posts, beams, shingles, and artisan tree carvings,
seasonal greens and berries.
(3) "Forestry vehicle" means every vehicle which is designed for and used for forest
product operations purposes, and used by the owner of the vehicle or family member(s) or
employee(s) or designees of the owner, in the conduct of the owner's forestry product operations,

which use shall include the delivery of forest products produced by the forester but shall not include
commercial hire for non-forestry product operation uses including, but not limited to, hauling of
sand and gravel, and snow plowing, other than directly on the vehicle owner's forest land.
(c) This section is only applicable to forest product operations with annual revenue of no
greater than two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000).
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000963
========
LC000963 - Page 2 of 3